South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 11, Chapter 21, Title 24 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 24-21-925. (A) Notwithstanding another provision of law, a person who has been convicted of a felony offense, not described in Section 16-23-10(3) and who has completed his sentence, may make application to the board for a limited pardon that would allow him to possess a firearm for the purpose of hunting only. (B) The application fee is two hundred dollars. One hundred dollars of the fee must be retained by the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services and the remaining one hundred dollars must be distributed to the State Law Enforcement Division. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----